Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB368.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1340 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1340. Antique, classic and collectible plates.* * *(b.1) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a person from operating a vehicle with an antique, classic, vintage, collectible or historic military vehicle registration plate while transporting people or property or towing another vehicle to a location, activity or event permitted under subsection (b), provided that the person does not receive compensation or anything of value for the transportation of people or property or for the towing of another vehicle.123456789101112131415161718 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0368PN0324 - 2 - 12